Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 68

Uniform Power of Attorney Act

Publisher's Notes. This chapter was amended in its entirety by Acts 2011, No. 805.

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, No. 805, § 1: Jan. 1, 2012.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, No. 805, § 1: Jan. 1, 2012.

28-68-101. Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Uniform Power of Attorney Act.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 659, §
4; A.S.A. 1947, §
58–704; Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote the section and the section heading.

28-68-102. Definitions.

In this chapter:

“Agent” means a person granted authority to act for a principal under a power of attorney, whether denominated an agent, attorney-in-fact, or otherwise. The term includes an original agent, coagent, successor agent, and a person to which an agent's authority is delegated.

“Durable,” with respect to a power of attorney, means not terminated by the principal's incapacity.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Good faith” means honesty in fact.

“Incapacity” means inability of an individual to manage property or business affairs because the individual:

has an impairment in the ability to receive and evaluate information or make or communicate decisions even with the use of technological assistance; or

is:

missing;

detained, including incarcerated in a penal system; or

outside the United States and unable to return.

“Person” means an individual, corporation, business trust, estate, trust, partnership, limited liability company, association, joint venture, public corporation, government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, or any other legal or commercial entity.

“Power of attorney” means a writing or other record that grants authority to an agent to act in the place of the principal, whether or not the term power of attorney is used.

“Presently exercisable general power of appointment,” with respect to property or a property interest subject to a power of appointment, means power exercisable at the time in question to vest absolute ownership in the principal individually, the principal's estate, the principal's creditors, or the creditors of the principal's estate. The term includes a power of appointment not exercisable until the occurrence of a specified event, the satisfaction of an ascertainable standard, or the passage of a specified period only after the occurrence of the specified event, the satisfaction of the ascertainable standard, or the passage of the specified period. The term does not include a power exercisable in a fiduciary capacity or only by will.

“Principal” means an individual who grants authority to an agent in a power of attorney.

“Property” means anything that may be the subject of ownership, whether real or personal, or legal or equitable, or any interest or right therein.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Sign” means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a record:

to execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

to attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic sound, symbol, or process.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Stocks and bonds” means stocks, bonds, mutual funds, and all other types of securities and financial instruments, whether held directly, indirectly, or in any other manner. The term does not include commodity futures contracts and call or put options on stocks or stock indexes.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-103. Applicability.

This chapter applies to all powers of attorney except:

a power to the extent it is coupled with an interest in the subject of the power, including a power given to or for the benefit of a creditor in connection with a credit transaction;

a power to make health-care decisions;

a proxy or other delegation to exercise voting rights or management rights with respect to an entity; and

a power created on a form prescribed by a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality for a governmental purpose.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-104. Power of attorney is durable.

A power of attorney created under this chapter is durable unless it expressly provides that it is terminated by the incapacity of the principal.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-105. Execution of power of attorney.

A power of attorney must be signed by the principal or in the principal's conscious presence by another individual directed by the principal to sign the principal's name on the power of attorney. A signature on a power of attorney is presumed to be genuine if the principal acknowledges the signature before a notary public or other individual authorized by law to take acknowledgments.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-106. Validity of power of attorney.

A power of attorney executed in this state on or after January 1, 2012, is valid if its execution complies with § 28-68-105.

A power of attorney executed in this state before January 1, 2012, is valid if its execution complied with the law of this state as it existed at the time of execution.

A power of attorney executed other than in this state is valid in this state if, when the power of attorney was executed, the execution complied with:

the law of the jurisdiction that determines the meaning and effect of the power of attorney pursuant to § 28-68-107; or

the requirements for a military power of attorney pursuant to 10 U.S.C. Section 1044b, as it existed on January 1, 2011.

Except as otherwise provided by statute other than this chapter, a photocopy or electronically transmitted copy of an original power of attorney has the same effect as the original.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-107. Meaning and effect of power of attorney.

The meaning and effect of a power of attorney is determined by the law of the jurisdiction indicated in the power of attorney and, in the absence of an indication of jurisdiction, by the law of the jurisdiction in which the power of attorney was executed.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-108. Nomination of guardian — Relation of agent to court-appointed fiduciary.

In a power of attorney, a principal may nominate a guardian of the principal's estate or guardian of the principal's person for consideration by the court if protective proceedings for the principal's estate or person are begun after the principal executes the power of attorney. Except for good cause shown or disqualification, the court shall make its appointment in accordance with the principal's most recent nomination.

If, after a principal executes a power of attorney, a court appoints a guardian of the principal's estate or other fiduciary charged with the management of some or all of the principal's property, the agent is accountable to the fiduciary as well as to the principal. The power of attorney is not terminated and the agent's authority continues unless limited, suspended, or terminated by the court.

If a power of attorney becomes effective upon the principal's incapacity and the principal has not authorized a person to determine whether the principal is incapacitated, or the person authorized is unable or unwilling to make the determination, the power of attorney becomes effective upon a determination in a writing or other record by:

a physician or licensed psychologist that the principal is incapacitated within the meaning of § 28-68-102(5)(A); or

an attorney at law, a judge, or an appropriate governmental official that the principal is incapacitated within the meaning of § 28-68-102(5)(B).

A person authorized by the principal in the power of attorney to determine that the principal is incapacitated may act as the principal's personal representative pursuant to the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, Sections 1171 through 1179 of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. Section 1320d, as it existed on January 1, 2011, and applicable regulations, to obtain access to the principal's health-care information and communicate with the principal's health-care provider.

the principal dies;

the principal becomes incapacitated, if the power of attorney is not durable;

the principal revokes the power of attorney;

the power of attorney provides that it terminates;

the purpose of the power of attorney is accomplished; or

the principal revokes the agent's authority or the agent dies, becomes incapacitated, or resigns, and the power of attorney does not provide for another agent to act under the power of attorney.

Incapacity of the principal of a power of attorney that is not durable does not revoke or terminate the power of attorney as to an agent or other person that, without actual knowledge of the incapacity, acts in good faith under the power of attorney. An act so performed, unless otherwise invalid or unenforceable, binds the principal and the principal's successors in interest.

The execution of a power of attorney does not revoke a power of attorney previously executed by the principal unless the subsequent power of attorney provides that the previous power of attorney is revoked or that all other powers of attorney are revoked.

has the same authority as that granted to the original agent; and

may not act until all predecessor agents have resigned, died, become incapacitated, are no longer qualified to serve, or have declined to serve.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-109. When power of attorney effective.

A power of attorney is effective when executed unless the principal provides in the power of attorney that it becomes effective at a future date or upon the occurrence of a future event or contingency.

If a power of attorney becomes effective upon the occurrence of a future event or contingency, the principal, in the power of attorney, may authorize one or more persons to determine in a writing or other record that the event or contingency has occurred.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-110. Termination of power of attorney or agent's authority.

A power of attorney terminates when:

An agent's authority terminates when:

the principal revokes the authority;

the agent dies, becomes incapacitated, or resigns;

an action is filed for the dissolution or annulment of the agent's marriage to the principal or their legal separation, unless the power of attorney otherwise provides; or

the power of attorney terminates.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, an agent's authority is exercisable until the authority terminates under subsection (b), notwithstanding a lapse of time since the execution of the power of attorney.

Termination of an agent's authority or of a power of attorney is not effective as to the agent or another person that, without actual knowledge of the termination, acts in good faith under the power of attorney. An act so performed, unless otherwise invalid or unenforceable, binds the principal and the principal's successors in interest.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-111. Coagents and successor agents.

A principal may designate two or more persons to act as coagents. Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, each coagent may exercise its authority independently.

A principal may designate one or more successor agents to act if an agent resigns, dies, becomes incapacitated, is not qualified to serve, or declines to serve. A principal may grant authority to designate one or more successor agents to an agent or other person designated by name, office, or function. Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, a successor agent:

Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney and subsection (d), an agent that does not participate in or conceal a breach of fiduciary duty committed by another agent, including a predecessor agent, is not liable for the actions of the other agent.

An agent that has actual knowledge of a breach or imminent breach of fiduciary duty by another agent shall notify the principal and, if the principal is incapacitated, take any action reasonably appropriate in the circumstances to safeguard the principal's best interest. An agent that fails to notify the principal or take action as required by this subsection is liable for the reasonably foreseeable damages that could have been avoided if the agent had notified the principal or taken such action.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-112. Reimbursement and compensation of agent.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, an agent is entitled to reimbursement of expenses reasonably incurred on behalf of the principal and to compensation that is reasonable under the circumstances.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-113. Agent's acceptance.

Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, a person accepts appointment as an agent under a power of attorney by exercising authority or performing duties as an agent or by any other assertion or conduct indicating acceptance.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-114. Agent's duties.

Notwithstanding provisions in the power of attorney, an agent that has accepted appointment shall:

act in accordance with the principal's reasonable expectations to the extent actually known by the agent and, otherwise, in the principal's best interest;

act in good faith; and

act only within the scope of authority granted in the power of attorney.

Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, an agent that has accepted appointment shall:

act loyally for the principal's benefit;

act so as not to create a conflict of interest that impairs the agent's ability to act impartially in the principal's best interest;

act with the care, competence, and diligence ordinarily exercised by agents in similar circumstances;

keep a record of all receipts, disbursements, and transactions made on behalf of the principal;

cooperate with a person that has authority to make health-care decisions for the principal to carry out the principal's reasonable expectations to the extent actually known by the agent and, otherwise, act in the principal's best interest; and

attempt to preserve the principal's estate plan, to the extent actually known by the agent, if preserving the plan is consistent with the principal's best interest based on all relevant factors, including:

the value and nature of the principal's property;

the principal's foreseeable obligations and need for maintenance;

minimization of taxes, including income, estate, inheritance, generation-skipping transfer, and gift taxes; and

eligibility for a benefit, a program, or assistance under a statute or regulation.

An agent that acts in good faith is not liable to any beneficiary of the principal's estate plan for failure to preserve the plan.

An agent that acts with care, competence, and diligence for the best interest of the principal is not liable solely because the agent also benefits from the act or has an individual or conflicting interest in relation to the property or affairs of the principal.

If an agent is selected by the principal because of special skills or expertise possessed by the agent or in reliance on the agent's representation that the agent has special skills or expertise, the special skills or expertise must be considered in determining whether the agent has acted with care, competence, and diligence under the circumstances.

Absent a breach of duty to the principal, an agent is not liable if the value of the principal's property declines.

An agent that exercises authority to delegate to another person the authority granted by the principal or that engages another person on behalf of the principal is not liable for an act, error of judgment, or default of that person if the agent exercises care, competence, and diligence in selecting and monitoring the person.

Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, an agent is not required to disclose receipts, disbursements, or transactions conducted on behalf of the principal unless ordered by a court or requested by the principal, a guardian, a conservator, another fiduciary acting for the principal, a governmental agency having authority to protect the welfare of the principal, or, upon the death of the principal, by the personal representative or successor in interest of the principal's estate. If so requested, within 30 days the agent shall comply with the request or provide a writing or other record substantiating why additional time is needed and shall comply with the request within an additional 30 days.

Where husband, who held power of attorney, conveyed ownership of real property and investment funds held as joint tenants with right of survivorship to a trust, the husband could not destroy the joint tenancy in either the real or personal property by his unilateral actions, and the wife's interest as the surviving tenant continued after the conveyance.Liberty Bank of Ark. v. Byrd, 2016 Ark. App. 86, 482 S.W.3d 746 (2016).

In a trust dispute, a husband's actions as power of attorney were contrary to a wife's testamentary intent and plan because the trust that the husband set up provided that upon the wife's death, the jointly held assets were to be disposed of according to the husband's estate plan, rather than the wife's plan.Liberty Bank of Ark. v. Byrd, 2016 Ark. App. 86, 482 S.W.3d 746 (2016).

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-115. Exoneration of agent.

A provision in a power of attorney relieving an agent of liability for breach of duty is binding on the principal and the principal's successors in interest except to the extent the provision:

relieves the agent of liability for breach of duty committed dishonestly, with an improper motive, or with reckless indifference to the purposes of the power of attorney or the best interest of the principal; or

was inserted as a result of an abuse of a confidential or fiduciary relationship with the principal.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-116. Judicial relief.

The following persons may petition a court to construe a power of attorney or review the agent's conduct, and grant appropriate relief:

the principal or the agent;

a guardian, conservator, or other fiduciary acting for the principal;

a person authorized to make health-care decisions for the principal;

the principal's spouse, parent, or descendant;

an individual who would qualify as a presumptive heir of the principal;

a person named as a beneficiary to receive any property, benefit, or contractual right on the principal's death or as a beneficiary of a trust created by or for the principal that has a financial interest in the principal's estate;

a governmental agency having regulatory authority to protect the welfare of the principal;

the principal's caregiver or another person that demonstrates sufficient interest in the principal's welfare; and

a person asked to accept the power of attorney.

Upon motion by the principal, the court shall dismiss a petition filed under this section, unless the court finds that the principal lacks capacity to revoke the agent's authority or the power of attorney.

In a trust dispute, although the argument was not raised in a bank's brief, an executor had standing under this section to bring an action for fraud on a wife's rights because the executor was the wife's only heir and was named as a beneficiary in her will.Liberty Bank of Ark. v. Byrd, 2016 Ark. App. 86, 482 S.W.3d 746 (2016).

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-117. Agent's liability.

An agent that violates this chapter is liable to the principal or the principal's successors in interest for the amount required to:

restore the value of the principal's property to what it would have been had the violation not occurred; and

reimburse the principal or the principal's successors in interest for the attorney's fees and costs paid on the agent's behalf.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-118. Agent's resignation — Notice.

Unless the power of attorney provides a different method for an agent's resignation, an agent may resign by giving notice to the principal and, if the principal is incapacitated:

to the conservator or guardian, if one has been appointed for the principal, and a coagent or successor agent; or

if there is no person described in paragraph (1), to:

the principal's caregiver;

another person reasonably believed by the agent to have sufficient interest in the principal's welfare; or

a governmental agency having authority to protect the welfare of the principal.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-119. Acceptance of and reliance upon acknowledged power of attorney.

For purposes of this section and § 28-68-120, “acknowledged” means purportedly verified before a notary public or other individual authorized to take acknowledgements.

A person that in good faith accepts an acknowledged power of attorney without actual knowledge that the signature is not genuine may rely upon the presumption under § 28-68-105 that the signature is genuine.

A person that in good faith accepts an acknowledged power of attorney without actual knowledge that the power of attorney is void, invalid, or terminated, that the purported agent's authority is void, invalid, or terminated, or that the agent is exceeding or improperly exercising the agent's authority may rely upon the power of attorney as if the power of attorney were genuine, valid and still in effect, the agent's authority were genuine, valid and still in effect, and the agent had not exceeded and had properly exercised the authority.

A person that is asked to accept an acknowledged power of attorney may request, and rely upon, without further investigation:

an agent's certification under penalty of perjury of any factual matter concerning the principal, agent, or power of attorney;

an English translation of the power of attorney if the power of attorney contains, in whole or in part, language other than English; and

an opinion of counsel as to any matter of law concerning the power of attorney if the person making the request provides in a writing or other record the reason for the request.

An English translation or an opinion of counsel requested under this section must be provided at the principal's expense unless the request is made more than seven business days after the power of attorney is presented for acceptance.

For purposes of this section and § 28-68-120, a person that conducts activities through employees is without actual knowledge of a fact relating to a power of attorney, a principal, or an agent if the employee conducting the transaction involving the power of attorney is without actual knowledge of the fact.

a person shall either accept an acknowledged statutory form power of attorney or request a certification, a translation, or an opinion of counsel under § 28-68-119(d) no later than seven business days after presentation of the power of attorney for acceptance;

if a person requests a certification, a translation, or an opinion of counsel under § 28-68-119(d), the person shall accept the statutory form power of attorney no later than five business days after receipt of the certification, translation, or opinion of counsel; and

a person may not require an additional or different form of power of attorney for authority granted in the statutory form power of attorney presented.

a request for a certification, a translation, or an opinion of counsel under § 28-68-119(d) is refused;

the person in good faith believes that the power is not valid or that the agent does not have the authority to perform the act requested, whether or not a certification, a translation, or an opinion of counsel under § 28-68-119(d) has been requested or provided; or

the person makes, or has actual knowledge that another person has made, a report to the Department of Human Services stating a good faith belief that the principal may be subject to physical or financial abuse, neglect, exploitation, or abandonment by the agent or a person acting for or with the agent.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-120. Liability for refusal to accept acknowledged statutory form power of attorney.

In this section, “statutory form power of attorney” means a power of attorney substantially in the form provided in §28-68-301 or that meets the requirements for a military power of attorney pursuant to 10 U.S.C. Section 1044b, as it existed on January 1, 2011.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c):

A person is not required to accept an acknowledged statutory form power of attorney if:

the person is not otherwise required to engage in a transaction with the principal in the same circumstances;

engaging in a transaction with the agent or the principal in the same circumstances would be inconsistent with federal law;

the person has actual knowledge of the termination of the agent's authority or of the power of attorney before exercise of the power;

A person that refuses in violation of this section to accept an acknowledged statutory form power of attorney is subject to:

a court order mandating acceptance of the power of attorney; and

liability for reasonable attorney's fees and costs incurred in any action or proceeding that confirms the validity of the power of attorney or mandates acceptance of the power of attorney.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-121. Principles of law and equity.

Unless displaced by a provision of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-122. Laws applicable to financial institutions and entities.

This chapter does not supersede any other law applicable to financial institutions or other entities, and the other law controls if inconsistent with this chapter.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-123. Remedies under other law.

The remedies under this chapter are not exclusive and do not abrogate any right or remedy under the law of this state other than this chapter.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

Subchapter 2

— Authority

Effective Dates. Acts 2011, No. 805, § 1: Jan. 1, 2012.

28-68-201. Authority that requires specific grant — Grant of general authority.

An agent under a power of attorney may do the following on behalf of the principal or with the principal's property only if the power of attorney expressly grants the agent the authority and exercise of the authority is not otherwise prohibited by another agreement or instrument to which the authority or property is subject:

amend, revoke, or terminate an inter vivos trust;

make a gift;

create or change rights of survivorship;

create or change a beneficiary designation;

delegate authority granted under the power of attorney;

waive the principal's right to be a beneficiary of a joint and survivor annuity, including a survivor benefit under a retirement plan; or

exercise fiduciary powers that the principal has authority to delegate.

Notwithstanding a grant of authority to do an act described in subsection (a), unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, an agent that is not an ancestor, spouse, or descendant of the principal, may not exercise authority under a power of attorney to create in the agent, or in an individual to whom the agent owes a legal obligation of support, an interest in the principal's property, whether by gift, right of survivorship, beneficiary designation, disclaimer, or otherwise.

Subject to subsections (a), (b), (d), and (e), if a power of attorney grants to an agent authority to do all acts that a principal could do, the agent has the general authority described in §§ 28-68-204 — 28-68-216.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, a grant of authority to make a gift is subject to § 28-68-217.

Subject to subsections (a), (b), and (d), if the subjects over which authority is granted in a power of attorney are similar or overlap, the broadest authority controls.

Authority granted in a power of attorney is exercisable with respect to property that the principal has when the power of attorney is executed or acquires later, whether or not the property is located in this state and whether or not the authority is exercised or the power of attorney is executed in this state.

An act performed by an agent pursuant to a power of attorney has the same effect and inures to the benefit of and binds the principal and the principal's successors in interest as if the principal had performed the act.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote the section and the section heading.

In a will contest, the facts showed that decedent's brother, as the attorney-in-fact, was not the maker of decedent's will, but merely acted as a conduit or messenger between the decedent and decedent's attorney concerning the decedent's wishes; thus, it was the decedent, and not his brother, who was the maker of the will. In re Estate of Garrett, 81 Ark. App. 212, 100 S.W.3d 72 (2003) (decision under prior law).

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote the section and the section heading.

Ademption of a devise did not take place as to unexpended, identifiable proceeds of a timber sale because the timber was sold by an attorney-in-fact at a time when the testatrix was incompetent, and the testatrix did not regain testamentary capacity before her death; the statute did not preclude such a holding because while the estate was unquestionably bound by the sale of the timber, the statute was silent on the issue of who was entitled to the proceeds of the sale.Rodgers v. Rodgers, 2012 Ark. 200, 406 S.W.3d 422 (2012).

History.

Acts 1981, No. 659, 1; A.S.A. 1947, §
58–701; Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-202. Incorporation of authority.

An agent has authority described in this subchapter if the power of attorney refers to general authority with respect to the descriptive term for the subjects stated in §§28-68-204 —28-68-217 or cites the section in which the authority is described.

A reference in a power of attorney to general authority with respect to the descriptive term for a subject in §§28-68-204 —28-68-217 or a citation to a section of §§28-68-204 —28-68-217 incorporates the entire section as if it were set out in full in the power of attorney.

A principal may modify authority incorporated by reference.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 659, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §
58–702; Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-203. Construction of authority generally.

Except as otherwise provided in the power of attorney, by executing a power of attorney that incorporates by reference a subject described in §§28-68-204 —28-68-217 or that grants to an agent authority to do all acts that a principal could do pursuant to §28-68-201(c), a principal authorizes the agent, with respect to that subject, to:

demand, receive, and obtain by litigation or otherwise, money or another thing of value to which the principal is, may become, or claims to be entitled, and conserve, invest, disburse, or use anything so received or obtained for the purposes intended;

contract in any manner with any person, on terms agreeable to the agent, to accomplish a purpose of a transaction and perform, rescind, cancel, terminate, reform, restate, release, or modify the contract or another contract made by or on behalf of the principal;

execute, acknowledge, seal, deliver, file, or record any instrument or communication the agent considers desirable to accomplish a purpose of a transaction, including creating at any time a schedule listing some or all of the principal's property and attaching it to the power of attorney;

initiate, participate in, submit to alternative dispute resolution, settle, oppose, or propose or accept a compromise with respect to a claim existing in favor of or against the principal or intervene in litigation relating to the claim;

seek on the principal's behalf the assistance of a court or other governmental agency to carry out an act authorized in the power of attorney;

engage, compensate, and discharge an attorney, accountant, discretionary investment manager, expert witness, or other advisor;

prepare, execute, and file a record, report, or other document to safeguard or promote the principal's interest under a statute or regulation;

communicate with any representative or employee of a government or governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, on behalf of the principal;

access communications intended for, and communicate on behalf of the principal, whether by mail, electronic transmission, telephone, or other means; and

do any lawful act with respect to the subject and all property related to the subject.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment rewrote the section and the section heading.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 659, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §
58–703; Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-204. Real property.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to real property authorizes the agent to:

demand, buy, lease, receive, accept as a gift or as security for an extension of credit, or otherwise acquire or reject an interest in real property or a right incident to real property;

sell; exchange; convey with or without covenants, representations, or warranties; quitclaim; release; surrender; retain title for security; encumber; partition; consent to partitioning; subject to an easement or covenant; subdivide; apply for zoning or other governmental permits; plat or consent to platting; develop; grant an option concerning; lease; sublease; contribute to an entity in exchange for an interest in that entity; or otherwise grant or dispose of an interest in real property or a right incident to real property;

pledge or mortgage an interest in real property or right incident to real property as security to borrow money or pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a debt of the principal or a debt guaranteed by the principal;

release, assign, satisfy, or enforce by litigation or otherwise a mortgage, deed of trust, conditional sale contract, encumbrance, lien, or other claim to real property which exists or is asserted;

manage or conserve an interest in real property or a right incident to real property owned or claimed to be owned by the principal, including:

insuring against liability or casualty or other loss;

obtaining or regaining possession of or protecting the interest or right by litigation or otherwise;

paying, assessing, compromising, or contesting taxes or assessments or applying for and receiving refunds in connection with them; and

purchasing supplies, hiring assistance or labor, and making repairs or alterations to the real property;

use, develop, alter, replace, remove, erect, or install structures or other improvements upon real property in or incident to which the principal has, or claims to have, an interest or right;

participate in a reorganization with respect to real property or an entity that owns an interest in or right incident to real property and receive, and hold, and act with respect to stocks and bonds or other property received in a plan of reorganization, including:

selling or otherwise disposing of them;

exercising or selling an option, right of conversion, or similar right with respect to them; and

exercising any voting rights in person or by proxy;

change the form of title of an interest in or right incident to real property; and

dedicate to public use, with or without consideration, easements or other real property in which the principal has, or claims to have, an interest.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-205. Tangible personal property.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to tangible personal property authorizes the agent to:

demand, buy, receive, accept as a gift or as security for an extension of credit, or otherwise acquire or reject ownership or possession of tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal property;

sell; exchange; convey with or without covenants, representations, or warranties; quitclaim; release; surrender; create a security interest in; grant options concerning; lease; sublease; or, otherwise dispose of tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal property;

grant a security interest in tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal property as security to borrow money or pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a debt of the principal or a debt guaranteed by the principal;

release, assign, satisfy, or enforce by litigation or otherwise, a security interest, lien, or other claim on behalf of the principal, with respect to tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal property;

manage or conserve tangible personal property or an interest in tangible personal property on behalf of the principal, including:

insuring against liability or casualty or other loss;

obtaining or regaining possession of or protecting the property or interest, by litigation or otherwise;

paying, assessing, compromising, or contesting taxes or assessments or applying for and receiving refunds in connection with taxes or assessments;

moving the property from place to place;

storing the property for hire or on a gratuitous bailment; and

using and making repairs, alterations, or improvements to the property; and

change the form of title of an interest in tangible personal property.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-206. Stocks and bonds.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to stocks and bonds authorizes the agent to:

buy, sell, and exchange stocks and bonds;

establish, continue, modify, or terminate an account with respect to stocks and bonds;

pledge stocks and bonds as security to borrow, pay, renew, or extend the time of payment of a debt of the principal;

receive certificates and other evidences of ownership with respect to stocks and bonds; and

exercise voting rights with respect to stocks and bonds in person or by proxy, enter into voting trusts, and consent to limitations on the right to vote.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.

28-68-207. Commodities and options.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise provides, language in a power of attorney granting general authority with respect to commodities and options authorizes the agent to:

buy, sell, exchange, assign, settle, and exercise commodity futures contracts and call or put options on stocks or stock indexes traded on a regulated option exchange; and

establish, continue, modify, and terminate option accounts.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 805, §
1.